District of Columbia statutes.
31-3106

Certification of nonhospital residential facilities and outpatient treatment facilities.

(a)

The Mayor shall certify qualifying nonhospital residential facilities and outpatient treatment facilities in the District in accordance with rules issued pursuant to § 31-3111.

(b)

Each certification issued by the Mayor shall state whether the facility is certified as a provider of treatment for drug abuse, alcohol abuse, mental illness, or a combination of these that shall be specified.

(c)

To qualify for certification, a nonhospital residential facility or outpatient treatment facility shall demonstrate that:

(1)

It offers an organized program for the treatment of drug abuse, alcohol abuse, mental illness, or any combination of these;

(2)

It operates under the day-to-day supervision of an individual with demonstrable training and experience in the treatment of drug abuse, alcohol abuse, or mental illness;

(3)

It employs sufficient numbers of professional staff members to deliver adequately the services offered to its patient caseload; and

(4)

It offers and has the capacity to provide services for the durations specified in §§ 31-3103 and 31-3104.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as superseding the requirements of chapter 5 of Title 44.

(e)

Any certification issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Human Services Facility endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 7, 34 DCR 491
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(kk), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(y), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Substance abuse treatment certification requirements, see § 44-1204.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-1204.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2306.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (e), substituted “Public Health: Human Services Facility endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Human Services Facility endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(y) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-195, “Drug Abuse, Alcohol Abuse, and Mental Illness Insurance Act of 1986.”, see Mayor’s Order 88-50, February 25, 1988.